Mississippi statutes. Title 25. Public Officers and Employees; Public Records
Article 1. Mississippi Ethics Commission.
§ 25-4-29.
Filing dates for statements.

Required statements hereunder shall be filed as follows:

Every incumbent public official required by paragraphs (a), (b), (d) and (e) of Section 25-4-25 to file a statement of economic interest shall file such statement with the commission on or before May 1 of each year that such official holds office, regardless of duration;

Candidates for office required to file a statement hereunder shall file such statement within fifteen (15) days after the deadline for qualification for that public office;

Persons who are required to file a statement because of appointment to fill a vacancy in an office or required to file under Section 25-4-25(d) and (e) shall file such statement within thirty (30) days of their appointment;

No person by reason of successful candidacy or assuming additional offices shall be required to file more than one (1) statement of economic interest in any calendar year, except such official shall notify the commission as soon as practicable of additional offices not previously reported; and

The commission may, on an individual case basis, provide for additional time to file a statement upon a showing that compliance with a filing date set out under paragraph (a), (b), (c) or (d) above would work an unreasonable hardship.

Any person who fails to file a statement of economic interest within thirty (30) days of the date the statement is due shall be deemed delinquent by the commission. The commission shall give written notice of the delinquency to the person by United States mail or by personal service of process. If within fifteen (15) days of receiving written notice of delinquency the delinquent filer has not filed the statement of economic interest, a fine of Fifty Dollars ($50.00) per day, not to exceed a total fine of One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00), shall be assessed against the delinquent filer for each day thereafter in which the statement of economic interest is not properly filed. The commission shall enroll such assessment as a civil judgment with the circuit clerk in the delinquent filer’s county of residence. The commission may enforce the judgment for the benefit of the State General Fund for the support of the Mississippi Adequate Education Program in the same manner as is prescribed for other civil judgments.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 508, § 10; reenacted and amended, Laws, 1982, ch. 488, § 16; reenacted, Laws, 1986, ch. 348, § 16; reenacted, Laws, 1990, ch. 491; Laws, 1995, ch. 360, § 16; reenacted without change, Laws, 1998, ch. 350, § 16; Laws, 2008, ch. 562, § 10; Laws, 2011, ch. 488, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2011.

§ 25-4-31.
Fines and penalties.

Any person who violates the confidentiality of a commission proceeding pursuant to this chapter is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, shall be fined not more than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) or imprisoned not more than one (1) year, or be both fined and imprisoned.

Any person who willfully and knowingly files a false complaint with the commission or who willfully affirms, reports or swears falsely in regard to any material matter before a commission proceeding is guilty of a felony, and, upon conviction, shall be punished by a fine of not less than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) nor more than Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00), or committed to the custody of the Department of Corrections for not more than five (5) years, or by both such fine and imprisonment.

Any person who, having been served with written notice of delinquency, shall fail to file a disclosure statement as required by this chapter within one (1) year of the date the statement is due, or who shall, although filing such statement, knowingly fail to disclose information required by this chapter, is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, shall be punished by a fine of not more than Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00).

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 508, §§ 11, 12; reenacted, Laws, 1982, ch. 488, § 17; reenacted, Laws, 1986, ch. 348, § 17; reenacted, Laws, 1990, ch. 491; Laws, 1995, ch. 360, § 17; reenacted without change, Laws, 1998, ch. 350, § 17; Laws, 2008, ch. 562, § 11, effective August 5, 2008 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965, to the amendment of this section).